New Jersey, session 221, A4230.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following items in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, are amended as follows: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050  Community Resources.......... [$154,741,000] $154,421,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Social Services Programs .. [154,741,000] $154,421,000 Grants-in-Aid: [05          Bergenfield Dominoes Club  Operating Costs ..... (50,000) 05            New Jersey Interscholastic Lacrosse Officials Association ............................................ (20,000) 05            Deal Sephardic Youth Center Inc.  Playground Expansion ...................................... (250,000)] STATE AID 05-8050  Community Resources.............. [$16,000,000] $11,000,000 Total State Aid appropriation, Social Services Programs .... [$16,000,000] $11,000,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ....... [$16,000,000] $11,000,000) State Aid: [05          Branch Brook Park Cherry Blossom Center (PTRF)................................. (5,000,000)] 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services [$1,140,332,000] $1,122,832,000 Total State Aid appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid [$1,140,332,000] $1,122,832,000 (From General Fund ..................................... $17,589,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund ....... [$1,122,743,000] $1,105,243,000) State Aid: [04          Camden County  Property Acquisition (PTRF)......................... ($5,000,000) 04            Township of Edision  Municipal Broadband Services (PTRF)            (2,000,000) 04            Township of North Brunswick  Municipal Complex (PTRF)   (1,500,000) 04            County of Essex  Administration Building (PTRF) .................... (5,000,000) 04            Township of Woodbridge  Public Marina Improvements (PTRF)       (4,000,000)] 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services GRANTS-IN-AID 05-2530  Support of the Arts.................... [$45,325,000] $45,225,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services ..............       [$45,325,000] $45,225,000 Grants-in-Aid: [05   Cheer Dynamics All Stars............................ ($100,000)] Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2021, c.133, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, the following unexpended balance of the following appropriation made in section 1 of P.L.2022, c.49 is deappropriated: 05 Grants-in-Aid Jersey City  Arts Museum Projects $18,000,000 Total Deappropriation ... $18,000,000 82 DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development GRANTS-IN-AID 38-2043  Economic Development....... [$323,682,000] $299,682,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Economic Planning and Development ..............................       [$323,682,000] $299,682,000 Grants-in-Aid: [38          Jersey City Redevelopment Agency  Art Museum Project.................................. ($24,000,000)] 2.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund and the General Fund the following amounts for the purposes specified: 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID 03-5120  Miscellaneous Grants-in-Aid........................... $210,135,047 Total State Aid appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $210,135,047 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ...      $22,500,000) State Aid: 03    Supplemental Stabilization Aid (PTRF).......................................... ($22,500,000) 03    Supplemental Stabilization Aid.......... (187,635,047) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Supplemental Stabilization Aid shall be subject to the following conditions: a school district that received an allotment of Supplemental Stabilization Aid pursuant to P.L.2023, c.32 shall, in addition to the amount proposed in the State aid notice for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, receive such aid in the same amount allotted to the district under P.L.2023, c.32; and a school district for which the State aid differential, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67), is positive in the 2024-2025 school year and that is subject to a State school aid reduction pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.) shall receive an amount of State school aid, in addition to the amount proposed in the State aid notice for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, equal to the difference between the amount of aid received in the 2023-2024 school year and the amount of aid proposed for the 2024-2025 school year, except that Supplemental Stabilization Aid shall not be allocated to a county vocational school district that, according to the amounts proposed in the State aid notices for the 2024-2025 school year distributed to school districts in March 2024, is proposed to receive vocational expansion stabilization aid pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-69). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.